apertium-eng-kaz1/apertium-eng-kaz.eng.dix
    <pardef n="pos_as_probj_dem_pl__prn">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l><b/>our</l>
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="yes">
      <p>
        <l><b/>our</l>
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l><b/>their</l>
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l><b/>these</l>
        <r><j/>this<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l><b/>those</l>
        <r><j/>that<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>



    <pardef n="ouml">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ö</l>
        <r>ö</r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>oe</l>
        <r>ö</r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="uuml">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ü</l>
        <r>ü</r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ue</l>
        <r>ü</r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>


 
   
    <pardef n="o_ou">

                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ou</l>
        <r>ou</r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>o</l>
        <r>ou</r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="RL" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ou</l>
        <r>ou</r>
      </p>
    </e>


    

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="z_s">

                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>z</l>
        <r>s</r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
        <i>s</i>
    </e>


    

                            <e r="RL" i="">
        <i>s</i>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="e_ae">

                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ae</l>
        <r>ae</r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>ae</r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="RL" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ae</l>
        <r>ae</r>
      </p>
    </e>


    

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="l_ll">

                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ll</l>
        <r>ll</r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>l</l>
        <r>ll</r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="RL" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ll</l>
        <r>ll</r>
      </p>
    </e>


    

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="e_oe">

                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>oe</l>
        <r>oe</r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>oe</r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="RL" i="">
      <p>
        <l>oe</l>
        <r>oe</r>
      </p>
    </e>


    

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="organi/ze__vblex">

                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>s</l>
        <r>s</r>
      </p>
        <par n="liv/e__vblex"/> 
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>z</l>
        <r>s</r>
      </p>
        <par n="liv/e__vblex"/> 
    </e>


                            <e r="RL" i="">
      <p>
        <l>s</l>
        <r>s</r>
      </p>
        <par n="liv/e__vblex"/> 
    </e>


    

    </pardef>

  
<pardef n="t/ake__vblex__sep">
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ake</l>
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ake</l>
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>akes</l>
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ook</l>
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>aken</l>
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>aking</l>
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>aking</l>
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>aking</l>
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="sw/ear__vblex__sep">
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ear</l>
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ear</l>
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ears</l>
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ore</l>
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>orn</l>
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>earing</l>
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>earing</l>
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>earing</l>
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="pa/y__vblex__sep">
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ys</l>
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>id</l>
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>id</l>
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ying</l>
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ying</l>
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
                        <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ying</l>
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

</pardef>

                            <e lm="take away" i=""><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>away</l><r><g><b/>away</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="Jürgen Trumpf" i=""><i>J</i><par n="uuml"/><i>rgen<b/>Trumpf</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
                            <e lm="Jürgen" i=""><i>J</i><par n="uuml"/><i>rgen</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
                            <e lm="Pöttering" i=""><i>P</i><par n="ouml"/><i>ttering</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
                            <e lm="take off prominence" i=""><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>off<b/>prominence</l><r><g><b/>off<b/>prominence</g></r></p></e>
                            <e i=""><i>D</i><par n="ouml"/><i>rler</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
			    <e lm="anaemic" i=""><i>an</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>mic</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="anaesthesia" i=""><i>an</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>sthesia</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="esophagus" i=""><par n="e_oe"/><i>sophagus</i><par n="access__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="favouritism" i=""><i>fav</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>ritism</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="foetus" i=""><i>f</i><par n="e_oe"/><i>tus</i><par n="access__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="apnoea" i=""><i>apn</i><par n="e_oe"/><i>a</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="palaeontologist" i=""><i>pal</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>ontologist</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="organisational" i=""><i>organi</i><par n="z_s"/><i>ational</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
                            <e lm="favourite" i=""><i>fav</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>rite</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
                            <e lm="vaporise" i=""><i>vapori</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="internalize" i=""><i>internali</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="take for granted" i=""><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>for<b/>granted</l><r><g><b/>for<b/>granted</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="Jürgen Trumpf" i=""><i>J</i><par n="uuml"/><i>rgen<b/>Trumpf</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
                            <e lm="Jürgen" i=""><i>J</i><par n="uuml"/><i>rgen</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
                            <e lm="Tönis" i=""><i>T</i><par n="ouml"/><i>nis</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
                            <e lm="Pöttering" i=""><i>P</i><par n="ouml"/><i>ttering</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
                            <e lm="esophagoscopy" i=""><par n="e_oe"/><i>sophagoscop</i><par n="bab/y__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="standardize" i=""><i>standardi</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="crystallise" i=""><i>crysta</i><par n="l_ll"/><i>i</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="encyclopaedia" i=""><i>encyclop</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>dia</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="glamorous" i=""><i>glam</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>rous</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
                            <e lm="World Health Organisation" i=""><i>World<b/>Health<b/>Organi</i><par n="z_s"/><i>ation</i><par n="Linux__np"/></e>
                            <e lm="populariser" i=""><i>populari</i><par n="z_s"/><i>er</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="saviour" i=""><i>savi</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>r</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="wear out" i=""><i>w</i><par n="sw/ear__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="wear away" i=""><i>w</i><par n="sw/ear__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>away</l><r><g><b/>away</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="travelling" i=""><i>trave</i><par n="l_ll"/><i>ing</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
                            <e lm="travelling saleswoman" i=""><i>trave</i><par n="l_ll"/><i>ing<b/>saleswoman</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="decentralize" i=""><i>decentrali</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="installment" i=""><i>insta</i><par n="l_ll"/><i>ment</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="unauthorized" i=""><i>unauthori</i><par n="z_s"/><i>ed</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
                            <e lm="pay out" i=""><i>pa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
